Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.030

Violations bureau for traffic cases—Disposition of moneys collected.

Every city or town may establish and operate under the supervision of the municipal court a violations bureau to assist the court in processing traffic cases. Each municipal court shall designate the specific traffic offenses and traffic infractions under city or town ordinances which may be processed by the violations bureau.

A violations bureau may be authorized to process traffic infractions in conformity with chapter 46.63 RCW.

A violations bureau may be authorized to receive the posting of bail for specified offenses and, to the extent authorized by court order, permitted to accept forfeiture of bail and payment of penalties. Any violations bureau, upon accepting the prescribed bail, shall issue a receipt therefor to the alleged violator, acknowledging the posting thereof and informing the accused of the legal consequences of bail forfeiture. Any person charged with any criminal traffic offense within the authority of the violations bureau may, upon signing a written appearance, a written plea of guilty and a written waiver of trial, pay to the violations bureau the fine established for the offense charged and costs and this shall have the same effect as a court conviction. All penalties and forfeitures paid to a violations bureau for the violation of municipal ordinance shall be placed in the city or town general fund or such other fund as may be prescribed by ordinance of the city or town or laws of the state of Washington.

Any employees of an existing violations bureau of any city shall continue as city employees.

[ 1984 c 258 s 105; 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 18; 1961 c 299 s 52.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.